Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 18 Georgia Tobacco Community Development Board

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1062, § 1 was redesignated as Chapter 19 and the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1249, § 1 was redesignated as Chapter 20.

2-18-1 through 2-18-6.

History.

Code 1981, §§

2-18-1

through 2-18-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 721, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 310, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 2-1/HB 553, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 2-2/HB 553, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Any assets of the Georgia Tobacco Community Development Board existing as of June 30, 2019, shall devolve by operation of law and without further action to the State of Georgia on July 1, 2019. Any liabilities and obligations of the Georgia Tobacco Community Development Board existing as of June 30, 2019, shall be transferred to and assumed by the State of Georgia, by such instruments as may be required to maintain the same.”